Georgia, session 2025_26, HB157.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act to provide a new charter for the Town of Braselton, approved June 3, 2003 (Ga. L.
2003, p. 4319), is amended by adding a new subsection to Section 1.11 to read as follows:
"(c) In addition to the other provisions of this section, the corporate limits of the town shall
include the following described properties:
All that tract or parcel of land lying and being in the 1765 and 1407, being Tracts 1 and
2 as shown on that certain survey for Town of Braselton Georgia dated November 21,
2023 by DES Davis Engineering & Surveying, Dusty L. Lowman, PLS 3216 recorded
11-22-2023 in Plat Book 87, page 51, Jackson County, Georgia records.
LESS AND EXCEPT Jackson County Tax Parcel 019 122 and B01 016A."
H. B. 157
- 1 -

LC 59 0020/AP
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 157
- 2 -